Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 21. Required Stops.

§ 63-3-1001.
Designation of stop intersections; design and placement of stop signs.

The state highway commission with reference to state highways, and local authorities with reference to other highways under their jurisdiction, may designate through highways and erect stop signs at specified entrances thereto or may designate any intersection signs at specified entrances thereto or may designate any intersection as a stop intersection and erect like signs at one or more entrances to such intersection.

Every said sign shall bear the word “Stop” in letters not less than 8“ in height which sign shall be self-illuminated at night or if not shall be reflectorized. Every stop sign shall be located as near as practical at the property line of the highway at the entrance to which the stop must be made, or at the nearest line of the crosswalk thereat, or, if none, at the nearest line of the roadway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8213; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1956, ch. 325.

§ 63-3-1003.
Designation of yield right-of-way entrances; conduct of driver at yield-right-of-way intersection; proof of failure to yield right-of-way.

The state highway commission with reference to state highways under its jurisdiction and local authorities with reference to other highways under their jurisdiction may, when traffic conditions warrant such action, give preference to traffic through any intersection on any highway and designate specified entrances to said intersections as yield right-of-way entrances by erecting yield-right-of-way signs in lieu of stop signs as required or permitted in Section 63-3-1001.

The driver of a vehicle in obedience to a yield-right-of-way sign shall reduce the speed of his vehicle to not more than twenty miles per hour and shall yield the right of way to other vehicles which have entered the intersecting highway either from the right or left or which are approaching so closely on said intersecting highway as to constitute an immediate hazard. However, said driver having so yielded may proceed at such time as a safe interval occurs.

If a driver is involved in a collision at an intersection or interferes with the movement of other vehicles after driving past a yield-right-of-way sign, such collision or interference shall be deemed prima facie evidence of the driver’s failure to yield right-of-way.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8213; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1956, ch. 325.

§ 63-3-1005.
Stops before emerging from alley, driveway or building.

The driver of a vehicle within a business or residence district emerging from an alley, driveway, or building shall stop such vehicle immediately prior to driving onto a sidewalk or into the sidewalk area extending across any alley way or private driveway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8214; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-1007.
Stops at railroad grade crossings in obedience to signal indicating approach of train or other on-track equipment; effect of noncompliance upon right of recovery in civil action.

Whenever any person driving a vehicle approaches a railroad grade crossing and a clearly visible electric or mechanical signal device gives warning of the immediate approach of a train or other on-track equipment, including, but not limited to, hi-rail vehicles and on-track maintenance equipment, the driver of such vehicle shall stop within fifty (50) feet but not less than fifteen (15) feet from the nearest track of such railroad and shall not proceed until he can do so safely.

The driver of a vehicle shall stop and remain standing and not traverse such a grade crossing when a crossing gate is lowered or when a human flagman gives or continues to give a signal of the approach or passage of a train or other on-track equipment, including, but not limited to, hi-rail vehicles and on-track maintenance equipment. The violation of this section shall not of itself defeat recovery and the question of negligence or the violation aforesaid, shall be left to the jury and the comparative negligence statute and prima facie statute of this state shall apply in these cases as in other cases of negligence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8209; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2004, ch. 448, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2004; Laws, 2018, ch. 303, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 63-3-1009.
Stops at designated particularly dangerous railroad grade crossings.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is hereby authorized to designate particularly dangerous highway grade crossings of railroads and to erect stop signs thereat. When such stop signs are erected the driver of any vehicle shall stop within fifty (50) feet but not less than fifteen (15) feet from the nearest track of such grade crossing and shall proceed only upon exercise of due care.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8210; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2004, ch. 448, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 63-3-1011.
Stops at railroad grade crossings by vehicles carrying passengers for hire or explosive substances and school buses.

The driver of any motor vehicle carrying passengers for hire or of any vehicle carrying explosive substances of flammable liquids as a cargo or part of a cargo, before crossing at grade any track or tracks of a railroad, shall stop the vehicle within fifty (50) feet but not less than fifteen (15) feet from the nearest rail of the railroad. While stopped, the driver shall listen and look in both directions along the track for:

Any approaching train or any other vehicle operated upon the rails for the purpose of maintenance of railroads, including, but not limited to, all hi-rail vehicles and on-track maintenance machines; and

Signals indicating the approach of a train or any other vehicle or machine operated upon the rails. The driver shall not proceed until he can do so safely.

No stop need be made at any crossing where a police officer or a traffic control signal directs traffic to proceed.

The driver of every school transportation vehicle used to transport pupils, upon approaching any railroad crossing, shall comply with the provisions of Section 37-41-55.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8211; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2004, ch. 448, § 5; Laws, 2011, ch. 327, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 63-3-1013.
Moving heavy equipment at railroad grade crossing.

No person shall operate or move any caterpillar tractor, steam shovel, derrick, roller, or any equipment or structure having a normal operating speed of six (6) or less miles per hour or a vertical body or load clearance of less than nine (9) inches above the level surface of a roadway upon or across any tracks at a railroad grade crossing without notice of any such intended crossing first being given to a superintendent of such railroad and a reasonable time being given to such railroad to provide proper protection at such crossing.

Before making any such crossing the person operating or moving any such vehicle or equipment shall first stop the same not less than fifteen (15) feet nor more than fifty (50) feet from the nearest rail of such railway and while so stopped shall listen and look in both directions along such track for any approaching train or other on-track equipment, including, but not limited to, hi-rail vehicles and on-track maintenance equipment and for signals indicating the approach of a train or other on-track equipment, including, but not limited to, hi-rail vehicles and on-track maintenance equipment, and shall not proceed until the crossing can be made safely.

No such crossing shall be made when warning is given by automatic signal or crossing gates or a flagman or otherwise of the immediate approach of a railroad train or car or other on-track equipment, including, but not limited to, hi-rail vehicles and on-track maintenance equipment

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8212; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2004, ch. 448, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2004; Laws, 2018, ch. 303, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.